Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2722
Bank Secrecy Act; reporting requirements.

A licensee and an authorized delegate shall file all reports required by the federal currency reporting, record-keeping, and suspicious activity reporting requirements set forth in the Bank Secrecy Act and other federal and state laws pertaining to money laundering. The timely filing of a complete and accurate report required under this section with the appropriate federal agency is deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this section.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 22;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 27.